Maryland, session 2026, SB0983.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
11–206.1.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0983*

SENATE BILL 983
(e) (1) Within 30 days of receipt of a notice of an institution’s intent to submit
a new program to the Commission in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, the
Commission may file, or the institutions of higher education in the State may file with the
Commission, an objection to implementation of a proposed [graduate] program provided
the objection is based on:
(i) Inconsistency of the proposed program with the institution’s
approved mission for a public institution of higher education and the mission statement
published in the official catalog of a private nonprofit institution of higher education;
(ii) Not meeting a regional or statewide need consistent with the
State Plan for Higher Education;
(iii) Unreasonable program duplication which would cause harm to
the State or students attending institutions of higher education in the State; or
(iv) Unnecessary program duplication in violation of the State’s
equal educational opportunity obligations under State and federal law.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Program Review Process Advisory Council within the Maryland Higher
Education Commission shall study and make recommendations on extending the objection
process for proposed academic programs under § 11–206.1 of the Education Article to
include new undergraduate programs proposed by a public institution of higher education
or a private nonprofit institution of higher education with consideration of relevant federal
and State legal precedence regarding unnecessary program duplication.
(b) On or before December 31, 2026, the Program Review Process Advisory
Council shall submit a report on its findings and recommendations to the Senate Education,
Energy, and the Environment Committee and the House Appropriations Committee, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.